Illinois, session 104th, HB5717.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Supreme Court Historic Preservation Act is 5amended by changing Section 20 as follows: 6    (705 ILCS 17/20)7    Sec. 20. Supreme Court Historic Preservation Fund. 8    (a) The Supreme Court Historic Preservation Fund is 9created as a special fund in the State treasury. Subject to 10appropriation, the moneys in the Fund shall be used only by the 11Commission as deemed appropriate for historic preservation and 12related purposes, including the hiring of necessary staff.13    (b) All moneys received by the Commission, including 14without limitation, grants, gifts, donations, bequests, fees, 15admissions, sales, and concessions, from any source, including 16private, public, governmental, and individual, must be 17deposited into the Fund. All interest that is attributable to 18moneys in the Fund must be deposited into the Fund.19    (c) On July 1, 2026 2007, or as soon thereafter as may be 20practical, the State Treasurer shall transfer the amount of 21$900,000 $5,000,000 from the General Revenue Fund to the 22Supreme Court Historic Preservation Fund.23(Source: P.A. 95-410, eff. 8-24-07.)   HB5717- 2 -LRB104 20456 JRC 33921 b1    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect July 1, 22026.